Utah statutes.
10-7-10.5.   Authority to require written application for water or sewer
service and to terminate service for failure to pay -- Limitations.
(1)  A municipality that owns or controls a system for furnishing water or for
providing sewer service may:
(a)  before furnishing water or providing sewer service to a property, require
the property owner or an authorized agent to submit a written application,
signed by the owner or an authorized agent, agreeing to pay for all water
furnished or sewer service provided to the property, respectively, whether
occupied by the owner or by a tenant or other occupant, according to the
ordinances, rules, and regulations adopted by the municipality; and
(b)  if an owner fails to pay for water furnished or sewer service provided to
the owner's property, discontinue furnishing water or providing sewer service
to the property, respectively, until all amounts for water furnished or sewer
service provided, respectively, are paid, subject to Subsection (2).
(2) (a)  A municipality may not use an owner's failure to pay for water
furnished or sewer service provided to the owner's property as a basis for not
furnishing water or providing sewer service to the property after ownership of
the property is transferred to a subsequent owner.
(b)  A municipality may not require an owner to pay for water that was
furnished or sewer service that was provided to the property before the
owner's ownership.
